West Virginia, session 2026, HB4201.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. Authorization for Department of administration to promulgate legislative rules. §64-2-1. Office of Technology. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 18, 2025, authorized under the authority of §5A-6B-3 of this code, modified by the Office of Technology to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 14, 2025, relating to the Office of Technology (cyber reporting, 163 CSR 03), is authorized.